California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 2016, and to the extent funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the department shall allocate thirty-one million one hundred thousand dollars ($31,100,000), plus any associated matching funds, to provide a salary increase, benefit increase, or both, excluding unfunded retirement liabilities, for regional center operations. Of this amount, twenty-nine million seven hundred thousand dollars ($29,700,000) shall be used for salary, benefit increases, or both, for regional center staff, and shall not supplant funding currently scheduled to be used for this purpose. These funds shall not be used to provide salary or benefit increases to regional center executive staff or for unfunded retirement liabilities. The remaining one million four hundred thousand dollars ($1,400,000) shall be used for an increase for administrative costs, consistent with those specified in subdivision (b) of Section 4629.7, for both regional centers and clients’ rights advocates contracts pursuant to subdivision
 (b) of Section 4433. Regional centers shall maintain documentation, subject to audit, on how this funding was allocated.

(d) By March 10, 2017, and again by October 1, 2017, and in a format prescribed by the department, each regional center shall report the following information to the department:

(1) The total amount provided to staff for purposes of subdivision (c).

(2) The position titles of staff receiving the increase and amounts of increases by title.

(3) The number of service coordinators receiving the increase.

(4) Data on staff turnover.

(5) The classification of expenditures and amount for each of the administrative costs outlined in subdivision (b) of Section 4629.7.

(6) The allocation methodology used by a regional center to distribute the funding.

(7) Any other information determined by the department.

(e) In its 2017–18 May Revision fiscal estimate, the department shall describe the implementation of the increase provided in subdivision (c), including, but not limited to, the data described in subdivision (d), aggregated by regional center and statewide, and the impact of the increase on caseload ratios.

(f) Any regional center that fails to report the information required by subdivision (d) to the department shall
 forfeit the increases described in subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 3.   (AB 1 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4639.6.

The Director of Developmental Services may issue directives to the regional centers as the director deems necessary to protect consumer rights, health, safety, or welfare, or in accordance with Section 4434. The regional center shall comply with any directive issued by the director pursuant to this section. The directive shall not be in conflict with existing statutes or regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 28, Sec. 18.   (SB 81)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4639.75.

(a) On an ongoing basis, and as necessary, the State Department of Developmental Services shall provide to regional centers, and make available on the Internet, up-to-date information about work incentive programs for persons with developmental disabilities and other information relevant to persons with developmental disabilities in making informed choices about employment options. This information may include, but not be limited to, the access and retention of needed benefits, the interactions of earned income, asset building, and other
 financial changes on benefits, employment resources and protections, taxpayer requirements and responsibilities, training opportunities, and information and services available through other agencies, organizations, or on the Internet.

(b) The department, in consultation with regional centers, shall assess the need for, and develop a plan for, training of regional center staff on employment issues facing persons with a developmental disability. The department shall not be required to implement training pursuant to this section if implementation cannot be achieved within existing resources, unless additional funding for this purpose becomes available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 397, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4639.76.

(a) A regional center with which the department maintains a contract pursuant to Section 4629 shall be subject to the California Public Records Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 902, Sec. 5.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.1. Regional Center Worker Retention [4639.80. - 4639.83.]

4639.80.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4630 or any other law, a contract between the State Department of Developmental Services and a private nonprofit association for the operation of a regional center pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 4620) that is entered into or renewed on and after January 1, 2019, shall include procedures for employee retention, as provided in this article.

(b) The following definitions apply for purposes of this article:

(1) “Change of operator” means the replacement, by the department, of a contractor with a successor contractor.

(2) “Contractor” means a nonprofit corporation with which
 the department contracts to operate a regional center pursuant to Sections 4621 and 4621.5.

(3) (A) “Covered employee” means an individual who has been employed by a contractor for at least 90 days immediately before a change of operator.

(B) “Covered employee” does not include any of the following:

(i) A managerial, supervisory, or confidential employee.

(ii) A temporary employee.

(iii) A part-time employee who has worked less than 20 hours per week for the predecessor contractor for at least 90 days immediately before the change of operator.

(4) “Department” means the State Department of Developmental
 Services.

(5) “Predecessor contractor” means the contractor before the change of operator.

(6) “Regional center” means a regional center as that term is used in this chapter.

(7) “Successor contractor” means the contractor following the change of operator.

(8) “Total compensation” means the combined value of the covered employee’s wages and benefits immediately before the change of operator. Total compensation may be paid entirely as wages or in any combination of wages and fringe benefits, to be determined by the successor contractor. Total compensation includes the following amounts:

(A) The covered employee’s hourly wage rate or per diem value of the covered employee’s monthly
 salary.

(B) Employer payments toward the covered employee’s health and welfare and pension benefits. Employer payments toward health and welfare and pension benefits shall include only those payments that are recognized as employer payments under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1773.1. of the Labor Code.

(9) “Transition period” means a period of 90 days immediately following the effective date of a change of operator.

(c) (1) The department shall notify a contractor operating a regional center that the department has awarded, or intends to award, the contract to a different contractor. The notification shall include the effective date of the change of operator and the name, address, and contact information of the successor contractor.

(2) At least 15 days before the effective date of the change of operator, the predecessor contractor shall provide to the successor contractor a list of the names, addresses, hire dates, total compensation, and classification of all covered employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 975, Sec. 3.   (SB 134)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4639.81.

A contract entered into or renewed pursuant to this article shall be subject to all of the following conditions:

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the successor contractor shall agree to retain all covered employees for at least 90 days following a change of operator.

(1) During the transition period, the successor contractor shall not reduce the total compensation of any covered employee.

(2) During the transition period, the successor contractor shall not terminate a covered employee without cause.

(3) If the successor contractor determines in good faith
 that it requires fewer employees at a covered employee’s principal place of employment during the transition period than were required by the predecessor contractor, the successor contractor shall retain qualified covered employees by seniority within each job classification.

(4) At the end of the transition period, the successor contractor shall make a written performance evaluation for each covered employee retained during the transition period.

(5) A successor contractor and a labor organization representing covered employees may, by collective bargaining agreement, provide that the agreement supersedes the requirements of this subdivision.

(b) At least 15 days before the effective date of a change of operator, the predecessor contractor shall cause to be posted public notice of the change of operator at each
 principal place of employment of any covered employee. The notice shall include the name of the predecessor contractor and its contact information, the name of the successor contractor and its contact information, and the effective date of the change of operator. The notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place in a manner to be readily viewed by covered employees. At least 15 days before the effective date of a change of operator, the predecessor contractor shall also cause the notice to be sent to any labor organization that represents the covered employees.

(c) A successor contractor shall retain the following records, in written or electronic format, for at least three years:

(1) The list provided to the successor contractor pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 4639.80.

(2) All offers of
 employment made to covered employees.

(3) All terminations of covered employees during a transition period, including the reasons for termination.

(4) All written performance evaluations of covered employees made pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 975, Sec. 3.   (SB 134)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4639.82.

(a) A covered employee who is not offered employment, who has been discharged in violation of this article, or who has been paid less than the covered employee’s total compensation during the transition period, may bring an action against a successor contractor in any superior court of the State of California with jurisdiction over the successor contractor.

(b) Upon finding a violation of this article, the court may award back pay, calculated at the rate of the covered employee’s total compensation, for each day the violation has occurred and continues to occur. The court may issue an injunction or appropriate order to stop the continued violation of this article, and provide any other relief as the court deems appropriate.

(c) If the covered employee is the prevailing party in the legal action, the court shall award the employee reasonable attorney’s fees and costs as part of the costs recoverable.

(d) A covered employee shall not maintain a cause of action under this section solely due to the failure of a successor contractor to provide a written performance evaluation pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 4639.81.

(e) The rights and remedies provided by this section are in addition to, and are not intended to supplant, any existing rights or remedies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 975, Sec. 3.   (SB 134)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4639.83.

The provisions of this article are severable. If any provision of this article or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 975, Sec. 3.   (SB 134)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Regional Center Responsibilities [4640. - 4659.2.]

4640.

(a) Contracts between the department and regional centers shall specify the service area and the categories of persons that regional centers shall be expected to serve and the services and supports to be provided.

(b) In order to ensure uniformity in the application of the definition of developmental disability contained in this division, the Director of Developmental Services shall, by March 1, 1977, issue regulations that delineate, by diagnostic category and degree of disability, those persons who are eligible for services and supports by regional centers. In issuing the regulations, the director shall invite and consider the views of regional center contracting agencies, the state council, and persons with a demonstrated and direct interest in developmental disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1043, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4640.6.

(a) In approving regional center contracts, the department shall ensure that regional center staffing patterns demonstrate that direct service coordination are the highest priority.

(b) Contracts between the department and regional centers shall require that regional centers implement an emergency response system that ensures that a regional center staff person will respond to a consumer, or individual acting on behalf of a consumer, within two hours of the time an emergency call is placed. This emergency response system shall be operational 24 hours per day, 365 days per year.

(c) Contracts between the department and regional centers shall require regional centers to have service
 coordinator-to-consumer ratios, as follows:

(1) An average service coordinator-to-consumer ratio of 1 to 62 for all consumers who have not moved from the developmental centers to the community since April 14, 1993. In no case shall a service coordinator for these consumers have an assigned caseload in excess of 79 consumers for more than 60 days.

(2) An average service coordinator-to-consumer ratio of 1 to 45 for all consumers who have moved from a developmental center to the community since April 14, 1993. In no case shall a service coordinator for these consumers have an assigned caseload in excess of 59 consumers for more than 60 days.

(3) The following coordinator-to-consumer ratios shall apply:

(A) All consumers enrolled in the Home and
 Community-based Services Waiver program for persons with developmental disabilities, an average service coordinator-to-consumer ratio of 1 to 62.

(B) All consumers who have moved from a developmental center to the community since April 14, 1993, and have lived continuously in the community for at least 12 months, an average service coordinator-to-consumer ratio of 1 to 62.

(C) All consumers who have not moved from the developmental centers to the community since April 14, 1993, and who are not described in subparagraph (A), an average service coordinator-to-consumer ratio of 1 to 66.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, an average service coordinator-to-consumer ratio of 1 to 40 for all consumers five years of age and younger.

(5) (A) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, enhanced service coordination, including a service coordinator-to-consumer ratio of 1 to 40, shall be available to consumers identified as having low or no purchase-of-service expenditures, as identified in the annual Budget Act.

(B) Enhanced service coordination, including the coordinator-to-consumer ratio specified in this paragraph shall be available to specified consumers until one of the following criteria are met:

(i) The family or consumer is no longer interested in receiving enhanced service coordination.

(ii) All of the consumer’s identified service needs have been thoroughly explored and offered.

(iii) All information and training were provided to the
 family and consumer and the consumer’s focused support goals were completed.

(iv) The family or consumer feels confident that they can continue to receive the assistance they need to be successful without receiving enhanced service coordination.

(C) For the purposes of this paragraph, “enhanced service coordination” may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Regular contact, via telephone or video, with consumers or their families.

(ii) Maintaining no less than quarterly contact with consumers or their families.

(iii) Having annual individual program plan or individual family service plan meetings.

(6) (A) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, an average service coordinator-to-consumer ratio of 1 to 25 for all consumers with complex needs.

(B) The coordinator-to-consumer ratio specified in this paragraph shall not be authorized for a consumer for more than 12 months after the consumer is no longer receiving the services described in clause (i) or (ii) of subparagraph (C), after the consumer is no longer placed in a facility described in clause (iii), (iv), (v), (vi), (vii), or (viii) of subparagraph (C), or after the department has made the determination described in clause (ix) of subparagraph (C), unless an extension is granted. An extension shall be based on a new and complete comprehensive assessment of the consumer’s needs. An extension may be granted one time, and shall not exceed six months.

(C) For the purposes of this
 paragraph, a “consumer with complex needs” means a consumer who is any of the following:

(i) Receiving regional center-funded mobile crisis services by a department-approved vendor, or has received those services within the past six months.

(ii) Receiving state-operated crisis assessment stabilization team services, or has received those services within the past six months.

(iii) Placed in a community crisis home, as defined in Section 4698.

(iv) Placed in an acute crisis home operated by the department, pursuant to Section 4418.7.

(v) Placed in a locked psychiatric setting or has been placed in a locked psychiatric setting in the past six months.

(vi) Placed in an institution for mental disease, as described in Part 5 (commencing with Section 5900) of Division 5.

(vii) Placed out of state as a result of appropriate services being unavailable within the state, pursuant to Section 4519.

(viii) Placed in a county jail and eligible for diversion pursuant to Chapter 2.8 (commencing with Section 1001.20) of Title 6 of Part 2 of the Penal Code or found incompetent to stand trial as described in Section 1370.1 of the Penal Code.

(ix) A person the department has determined cannot be safely served in a developmental center, as described in Section 6510.5.

(7) For purposes of paragraph (3), service coordinators may have a mixed caseload of
 consumers three years of age and younger, consumers enrolled in the Home and Community-based Services Waiver program for persons with developmental disabilities, and other consumers if the overall average caseload is weighted proportionately to ensure that overall regional center average service coordinator-to-consumer ratios as specified in paragraph (3) are met. For purposes of paragraph (3), in no case shall a service coordinator have an assigned caseload in excess of 84 for more than 60 days.

(d) For purposes of this section, “service coordinator” means a regional center employee whose primary responsibility includes preparing, implementing, and monitoring consumers’ individual program plans, securing and coordinating consumer services and supports, and providing placement and monitoring activities.

(e) In order to ensure that caseload ratios are maintained pursuant to this
 section, each regional center shall provide service coordinator caseload data to the department, annually for each fiscal year. The data shall be submitted in the format, including the content, prescribed by the department. Within 30 days of receipt of data submitted pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall make a summary of the data available to the public upon request. The department shall verify the accuracy of the data when conducting regional center fiscal audits. Data submitted by regional centers pursuant to this subdivision shall:

(1) Only include data on service coordinator positions as defined in subdivision (d). Regional centers shall identify the number of positions that perform service coordinator duties on less than a full-time basis. Staffing ratios reported pursuant to this subdivision shall reflect the appropriate proportionality of these staff to consumers served.

(2) Be reported separately for service coordinators whose caseload includes any of the following:

(A) Consumers who are three years of age and older and who have not moved from the developmental center to the community since April 14, 1993.

(B) Consumers who have moved from a developmental center to the community since April 14, 1993.

(C) Consumers who are younger than three years of age.

(D) Consumers enrolled in the Home and Community-based Services Waiver program.

(3) Not include positions that are vacant for more than 60 days or new positions established within 60 days of the reporting month that are still vacant.

(4) For purposes of calculating caseload ratios for consumers enrolled in the Home and Community-based Services Waiver program, vacancies shall not be included in the calculations.

(f) The department shall provide technical assistance and require a plan of correction for any regional center that, for two consecutive reporting periods, fails to maintain service coordinator caseload ratios required by this section or otherwise demonstrates an inability to maintain appropriate staffing patterns pursuant to this section. Plans of correction shall be developed following input from the state council, local organizations representing consumers, family members, regional center employees, including recognized labor organizations, and service providers, and other interested parties.

(g) Each time that new funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act to the department for
 allocation to regional centers with the stated purpose of reducing caseload ratios, both of the following shall occur:

(1) Each regional center shall hold at least one public meeting during that year to receive stakeholder input to help inform the way the regional center allocates new positions funded through the allocation to that regional center. Stakeholders may include the state council, local organizations representing consumers, family members, community-based organizations that represent the ethnic and language diversity of the regional center catchment area, regional center employees, including recognized labor organizations and service providers, and other interested parties. The public meeting required by this paragraph fulfills a regional center’s requirement under subdivision (f) to gather input regarding its plan of correction if the plan of correction is discussed during the meeting.

(2) On or before October 10 of the year of the appropriation of funds, and again by March 10 of that fiscal year, and in a format prescribed by the department, each regional center shall report the following information to the department:

(A) The number of new service coordinator positions created with the funds allocated to reduce caseload ratios.

(B) Data on current caseload ratios as of March 1 and October 1, respectively.

(C) Any other information determined by the department.

(3) The department shall post the information required to be reported by a regional center pursuant to paragraph (2) on its internet website.

(h) Contracts between the department and regional center shall require the regional center to have, or contract for, all of the following areas:

(1) Criminal justice expertise to assist the regional center in providing services and supports to consumers involved in the criminal justice system as a victim, defendant, inmate, or parolee.

(2) Special education expertise to assist the regional center in providing advocacy and support to families seeking appropriate educational services from a school district.

(3) Family support expertise to assist the regional center in maximizing the effectiveness of support and services provided to families.

(4) Housing expertise to assist the regional center in accessing affordable housing for consumers in
 independent or supportive living arrangements.

(5) Community integration expertise to assist consumers and families in accessing integrated services and supports and improved opportunities to participate in community life.

(6) Quality assurance expertise, to assist the regional center to provide the necessary coordination and cooperation with the state council, in conducting quality-of-life assessments and coordinating the regional center quality assurance efforts.

(7) Each regional center shall employ at least one consumer advocate who is a person with developmental disabilities.

(8) Other staffing arrangements related to the delivery of services that the department determines are necessary to ensure maximum cost-effectiveness and to ensure that the
 service needs of consumers and families are met.

(9) Implicit bias training, pursuant to Section 4511.1, to increase service access and equity in the developmental services system.

(10) Language access and cultural competency services and support, pursuant to Section 4620.4, to allow consistent access to information and services and to advance person-centered health and human services equity outcomes toward the diminishment of racial, ethnic, and other disparities.

(i) Any regional center proposing a staffing arrangement that substantially deviates from the requirements of this section shall request a waiver from the department. Prior to granting a waiver, the department shall require a detailed staffing proposal, including, but not limited to, how the proposed staffing arrangement will benefit consumers and families
 served, and shall demonstrate clear and convincing support for the proposed staffing arrangement from constituencies served and impacted, that include, but are not limited to, consumers, families, providers, advocates, and recognized labor organizations. In addition, the regional center shall submit to the department any written opposition to the proposal from organizations or individuals, including, but not limited to, consumers, families, providers, and advocates, including recognized labor organizations. The department may grant waivers to regional centers that sufficiently demonstrate that the proposed staffing arrangement is in the best interest of consumers and families served, complies with the requirements of this chapter, and does not violate any contractual requirements. A waiver shall be approved by the department for up to 12 months, at which time a regional center may submit a new request pursuant to this subdivision.

(j) From
 February 1, 2009, to June 30, 2010, inclusive, the following shall not apply:

(1) The service coordinator-to-consumer ratio requirements of paragraph (1), and subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3), of subdivision (c).

(2) The requirements of subdivision (e). The regional centers shall, instead, maintain sufficient service coordinator caseload data to document compliance with the service coordinator-to-consumer ratio requirements in effect pursuant to this section.

(3) The requirements of paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (h).

(k) From July 1, 2010, until June 30, 2013, the following shall not apply:

(1) The service coordinator-to-consumer ratio requirements of paragraph (1), and
 subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3), of subdivision (c).

(2) The requirements of paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (h).

(l) (1) Any contract between the department and a regional center entered into on and after January 1, 2003, shall require that all employment contracts entered into with regional center staff or contractors be available to the public for review, upon request. For purposes of this subdivision, an employment contract or portion thereof may not be deemed confidential nor unavailable for public review.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the social security number of the contracting party may not be disclosed.

(3) The term of the employment contract between the regional center and an employee or
 contractor shall not exceed the term of the state’s contract with the regional center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 18.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4640.7.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that regional centers assist persons with developmental disabilities and their families in securing those services and supports which maximize opportunities and choices for living, working, learning, and recreating in the community.

(b) Each regional center design shall reflect the maximum cost-effectiveness possible and shall be based on a service coordination model, in which each consumer shall have a designated service coordinator who is responsible for providing or ensuring that needed services and supports are available to the consumer. Regional centers shall examine the differing levels of coordination services needed by consumers and families in order to establish varying caseload ratios within the regional center which will best meet those needs of their consumers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1011, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4640.8.

When convening any task force or advisory group, a regional center shall make its best effort to ensure representation by consumers and family members representing the community’s multicultural diversity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 414, Sec. 16.   Effective September 22, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4640.9.

Beginning July 1, 2020, each regional center shall provide to the department a copy of any corrective action plans and sanctions issued to a service provider, which shall include the name of the service provider, the type of action taken, and the date of action. Copies of corrective action plans and sanctions shall be submitted quarterly, no later than 45 days following the end of each fiscal quarter. The department shall provide a copy of all corrective action plans and sanctions to the protection and advocacy agency specified in Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4900) within 30 days of its request. The department shall consult with regional centers and the protection and advocacy agency on the process for increasing consumer and family access to the information contained in corrective action plans and
 sanctions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 28, Sec. 20.   (SB 81)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4641.

All regional centers shall conduct casefinding activities, including notification of availability of service in English and such other languages as may be appropriate to the service area, outreach services in areas with a high incidence of developmental disabilities, and identification of persons who may need service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4641.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The provision of services that are culturally and linguistically responsive to consumers is instrumental to improving access and equity in the developmental services system.

(2) Direct service professionals are critical to the provision of services and supports to individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families.

(3) In recognition of the value of effective communication between direct service professionals and the consumers and families they serve, the provision of a pay differential for bilingual and multilingual
 direct service professionals will increase consumer access to staff who speak their preferred language.

(b) The department, subject to an appropriation, shall establish and implement a system that promotes equity in access to services for regional center consumers by providing a pay differential to direct service professionals who can communicate in a language or medium other than English as part of their regular job duties.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a direct service professional described in subdivision (b) is eligible for a bilingual or multilingual differential if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The duties currently assigned to the direct service professional require regular communication in a language or medium other than English with an individual that has a developmental disability, and
 when appropriate, their families.

(2) The direct service professional passes an examination certifying their ability to communicate in the language or medium other than English.

(3) For the purpose of this section, “medium other than English” includes, but is not limited to, American Sign Language and other sign languages and augmentative and alternative communication.

(d) The department may adopt emergency regulations to implement this section. The adoption, amendment, repeal, or readoption of a regulation authorized by this section is deemed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code. The department is exempted from the requirement that it describe specific facts showing the need for
 immediate action.

(e) Prior to implementation, the department shall provide a report to the Legislature detailing its plan to implement a wage differential for bilingual and multilingual staff.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 29.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4641.5.

(a) Effective July 1, 2011, regional centers shall begin transitioning all vendors of all regional center services to electronic billing for services purchased through a regional center. All vendors and contracted providers shall submit all billings electronically for services provided on or after July 1, 2012, with the exception of the following:

(1) A vendor or provider whose services are paid for by vouchers, as that term is defined in subdivision (i) of Section 4512.

(2) A vendor or provider who demonstrates that submitting billings electronically for services presents a substantial financial hardship for the provider.

(b) For
 purposes of this section, “electronic billing” is defined as the Regional Center e-Billing System Web application provided by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 196.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4642.

(a) (1) Any person believed to have a developmental disability, and any person believed to have a high risk of parenting a developmentally disabled infant shall be eligible for initial intake and assessment services in the regional centers. In addition, any infant having a high risk of becoming developmentally disabled may be eligible for initial intake and assessment services in the regional centers. For purposes of this section, “high-risk infant” means a child less than 36 months of age whose genetic, medical, or environmental history is predictive of a substantially greater risk for developmental disability than that for the general population. The department, in consultation with the State Department of Public Health, shall develop specific risk and service criteria for the high-risk infant program
 on or before July 1, 1983. These criteria may be modified in subsequent years based on analysis of actual clinical experience.

(2) Initial intake shall be performed within 15 working days following request for assistance. Initial intake shall include, but need not be limited to, information and advice about the nature and availability of services provided by the regional center and by other agencies in the community, including guardianship, conservatorship, income maintenance, mental health, housing, education, work activity and vocational training, medical, dental, recreational, and other services or programs that may be useful to persons with developmental disabilities or their families. Intake shall also include a decision to provide assessment.

(3) Commencing on January 1, 2025, the regional
 center shall take the following actions by the end of the 15-day initial intake period described in paragraph (2):

(A) Either of the following actions:

(i) Determine if the individual is eligible for regional center services.

(ii) Determine if the regional center will initiate the assessment specified in Section 4643.

(B) Inform the individual requesting intake of the regional center’s action.

(C) If the regional center determines that the individual is not eligible for regional center services, or that the regional center is not initiating the assessment specified in Section 4643,
 provide the individual requesting intake and, if appropriate, the individual’s parents, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative, with adequate notice as required by Section 4710.

(4) (A) The department shall create, with input from stakeholders, standardized information packets to be provided to any person seeking services from a regional center. There shall be one information packet related to services provided under the California Early Intervention Services Act and another information packet related to services provided under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act. The information
 packets shall be translated to provide language access, as required by state and federal law, shall be available in alternative formats and alternative modes of communication, as required by federal law, and shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(i) An overview of the regional center system.

(ii) A resource guide for consumers and their families.

(iii) Consumer rights.

(iv) Contact information for the regional center, the department, the office of clients’ rights advocacy, and the protection and advocacy agency specified in Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4900).

(B) Each regional center shall distribute the information packets at intake, upon transfer to receiving
 services under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act, and upon request. Each regional center shall begin distributing the information packets within 60 days following the department providing the information packets and issuing directives regarding the distribution of the information packets. In addition to, and not in lieu of, this requirement, each regional center shall post the full content of the most updated information packet on its internet website.

(b) A regional center shall communicate with the consumer and the consumer’s family pursuant to this section in their
 preferred language, including providing alternative communication services and alternative formats, as required by state and federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 192, Sec. 9.   (SB 138)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4643.
